Alabama, session 2026rs, HB171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
39 Section 1. For the purposes of this act, the following
40 terms have the following meanings:
41 (1) ACCESSIBLE USER INTERFACE. An interface that
42 requires minimal user interactions, such as clicks, taps, or
43 swipes, for a user to input data, make a choice, or take an
44 action while using an addictive social media platform.
45 (2) ADDICTIVE FEED. A website, online service, online
46 application, or mobile application, or a portion thereof, in
47 which multiple pieces of media generated or shared by users of
48 a website, online service, online application, or mobile
49 application, either concurrently or sequentially, are
50 recommended, selected, or prioritized for display to a user
51 based in whole or in part on information associated with the
52 user or the user's device, unless any of the following
53 conditions are met:
54 a. The recommendation, selection, or prioritization is
55 based on information that is not associated with the user or
56 user's device and does not concern the user's previous
Page 2

user's device and does not concern the user's previous
HB171 INTRODUCED
57 interactions with media generated or shared by other users.
58 b. The recommendation, prioritization, or selection of
59 media is based on user-selected privacy, user-enabled
60 accessibility settings, or technical information concerning
61 the user's device.
62 c. The user expressly and unambiguously requested that
63 specific media, media by a specified author, creator, or
64 poster of media to which the user has subscribed, or media
65 shared by users to a page or group to which the user has
66 subscribed. This condition is not met if the media is
67 recommended, selected, or prioritized for display based in
68 whole or in part on other information associated with the user
69 or the user's device.
70 d. The user expressly and unambiguously requested that
71 specific media, media by a specified author, creator, or
72 poster of media the user has subscribed to, or media shared by
73 users to a page or group the user has subscribed to, be
74 blocked or deprioritized for display. This condition is not
75 met if the media is not blocked or deprioritized based on
76 other information associated with the user or the user's
77 device.
78 e. The media is part of direct and private
79 communications.
80 f. The media recommended, selected, or prioritized is
81 in response to a specific search inquiry by the user.
82 g. The media recommended, selected, or prioritized for
83 display is exclusively next in a preexisting sequence from the
84 same author, creator, poster, or source.
Page 3

same author, creator, poster, or source.
HB171 INTRODUCED
85 h. The recommendation, selection, or prioritization is
86 necessary to comply with this act and any rules adopted
87 pursuant to this act.
88 (3) ADDICTIVE SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM. A website, online
89 service, online application, or mobile application that offers
90 or provides users an addictive feed as a significant part of
91 the services provided by the website, online service, online
92 application, or mobile application.
93 (4) COVERED MINOR. A user of a website, online service,
94 online application, or mobile application in Alabama when the
95 covered operator has actual knowledge the user is a minor.
96 (5) COVERED OPERATOR. Any person who operates an
97 addictive social media platform. The term does not include
98 Internet service providers, data center operators, or similar
99 providers of services that are necessary for users to access
100 an addictive social media platform but that do not offer a
101 platform or addictive feed through the service.
102 (6) COVERED USER. A user of a website, online service,
103 online application, or mobile application in Alabama who is
104 not acting as an operator, or agent or affiliate of the
105 operator, of the website, online service, online application,
106 or mobile application, or any portion thereof.
107 (7) MEDIA. A piece of text, an image, or a video.
108 (8) MINOR. An individual under 18 years of age.
109 (9) PARENT. The parent or legal guardian of a minor.
110 (10) REASONABLE AGE-VERIFICATION METHOD. Any
111 commercially available software, application, program, or
112 methodology that, when enabled, provides reasonable assurances
Page 4

methodology that, when enabled, provides reasonable assurances
HB171 INTRODUCED
113 that any individual accessing certain published material is 18
114 years of age or older.
115 (11) WEIGHT. An individual numeric setting that
116 controls the output of an addictive feed's algorithm at a high
117 level across an addictive social media platform's user base,
118 such as the relative contributions of different factors to how
119 media is prioritized.
120 Section 2. (a) It shall be unlawful for a covered
121 operator to provide an addictive feed to a covered user
122 unless:
123 (1) The operator employs a reasonable age-verification
124 method on the addictive social media platform to provide
125 reasonable assurance that individuals under 18 years of age
126 cannot access the addictive feed; or
127 (2) The covered operator has obtained verifiable
128 parental consent to provide an addictive feed to a covered
129 minor.
130 (b)(1) Information collected for the purpose of
131 obtaining age-verification or parental consent shall not be
132 used for any other purpose and shall be deleted immediately
133 after an attempt to obtain age verification, except where
134 necessary for compliance with any applicable state or federal
135 law.
136 (2) If an operator, intentionally or unintentionally,
137 shares any consumer information collected for the purpose of
138 obtaining age-verification or parental consent in violation of
139 subdivision (1), the operator shall be liable to the party
140 injured in an action at law, suit in equity, or other proper
Page 5

injured in an action at law, suit in equity, or other proper
HB171 INTRODUCED
141 proceeding for redress.
142 (c) Nothing in this section shall be construed as
143 preventing any action taken in good faith to restrict access
144 to or availability of media which the covered operator
145 considers to be obscene or otherwise objectionable.
146 Section 3. Each covered operator shall provide an
147 accessible user interface on his or her addictive social media
148 platform which gives covered users the option to expressly and
149 unambiguously communicate their preferences about the types of
150 items to be recommended and to be blocked in the website's,
151 service's, or application's output. Covered operators shall
152 take all reasonable steps to ensure that the media selected
153 for display is consistent with those preferences.
154 Section 4. It shall be unlawful for the covered
155 operator of an addictive social media platform to send
156 notifications to a covered minor between the hours of 12:00
157 a.m. and 6:00 a.m.
158 Section 5. Nothing in this act shall be construed as
159 requiring the operator of an addictive social media platform
160 to give a parent any additional or special access to or
161 control over the data or accounts of his or her minor child.
162 Section 6. Other than as necessary for compliance with
163 this act, a covered operator shall not withhold, degrade,
164 lower the quality, or increase the price of any product,
165 service, or feature to a covered user due to the covered
166 operator being prohibited from providing an addictive feed to
167 a covered minor under Section 2(a) or due to the user's
168 exercise of any rights contained in Section 3.
Page 6

exercise of any rights contained in Section 3.
HB171 INTRODUCED
169 Section 7. (a) A covered operator that administers an
170 addictive feed shall prominently and conspicuously provide on
171 the operator's website, service, or application:
172 (1) A description of each algorithmic system that is in
173 use by the covered operator;
174 (2) A description of each source of input to each
175 algorithmic system used in any deployed addictive feed and the
176 source of the data of each input; and
177 (3) A description of the weights used in each addictive
178 feed. The covered operator shall categorize each weight into
179 four quartile groups according to each weight's relative
180 importance in contributing to the system's output.
181 (b) A covered operator shall disclose on the addictive
182 social media platform, on an annual basis, the high-level
183 objectives, key results, and performance metrics the covered
184 operator uses to evaluate product teams responsible for
185 addictive feed design. This disclosure must be accessible by
186 the general public.
187 Section 8. (a) This act shall apply to conduct that
188 occurs in whole or in part in the State of Alabama. For
189 purposes of this act, conduct takes place wholly outside of
190 Alabama if the addictive social media platform is accessed by
191 a user who is physically located outside of Alabama.
192 (b) Nothing in this act shall be construed to impose
193 liability for commercial activities or actions by operators
194 that is inconsistent with the treatment of such activities or
195 actions under 15 U.S.C. § 6502.
196 Section 9. (a) No earlier than April 1, 2027, whenever
Page 7

Section 9. (a) No earlier than April 1, 2027, whenever
HB171 INTRODUCED
197 it appears to the Attorney General, either upon complaint or
198 otherwise, that any person, within or outside the state, has
199 engaged in any of the acts or practices in violation of this
200 act, the Attorney General shall:
201 (1) Send a notice to the operator that informs the
202 operator there has been a violation under this act, provides
203 factual information regarding the specific violation, and
204 informs the operator that the operator has 30 days to remedy
205 the violation before any action will be taken by the Attorney
206 General. If the operator remedies the violation within 30 days
207 following receipt of the notice, the Attorney General may not
208 bring any action or proceeding under subdivision (2); and
209 (2) If the operator fails to remedy the violation
210 within 30 days following receipt of a notice, bring an action
211 or special proceeding in the name and on behalf of the State
212 of Alabama to do any of the following:
213 a. Enjoin any violation of this act.
214 b. Obtain restitution of any monies or property
215 obtained, directly or indirectly, by a violation of this act.
216 c. Seek forfeiture of any profits or gains obtained,
217 directly or indirectly, including, but not limited to, the
218 destruction of unlawfully obtained data.
219 d. Obtain damages caused, directly or indirectly, by a
220 violation of this act.
221 e. Obtain civil penalties of up to five thousand
222 dollars ($5,000) per violation.
223 f. Obtain any other and further relief as the court may
224 deem proper, including preliminary relief.
Page 8

deem proper, including preliminary relief.
HB171 INTRODUCED
225 (b) The Attorney General shall maintain a website to
226 receive complaints, information, or referrals from members of
227 the public concerning a covered operator's or social media
228 platform's alleged compliance or noncompliance with this act.
229 Section 10. This act shall become effective on October
230 1, 2026.
Page 9